District of Columbia statutes.
42-3502.03a

Rent Administrator — Appointment and removal.

(a)

The Rent Administrator shall be appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council.

(b)

The Mayor shall transmit a nomination of the Rent Administrator to the Council, for a 90-day period of review, excluding days of Council recess, including any Rent Administrator holding that position on March 25, 2009. If the Council does not approve by resolution a nomination of the Rent Administrator within the 90-day period of review, the nomination shall be deemed disapproved.

(c)

The Rent Administrator shall serve a 3-year term. The Mayor may appoint the same person to serve as the Rent Administrator for successive terms subject to the advice and consent of the Council as provided by subsection (b) of this section.

(d)

The Mayor shall nominate a Rent Administrator within 6 months of:

(1)

March 25, 2009; or

(2)

The occurrence of a vacancy in the position of Rent Administrator.

(e)

The Mayor shall remove the Rent Administrator for cause only; provided, that the Mayor shall provide the Council with a written justification within 30 days of the removal.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 203a
as added Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-366, § 2(d), 56 DCR 1332
Former § 42-3502.03a has been recodified as § 42-3502.04b by D.C. Law 17-366, § 2(c).